Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska75-133
Regulated parties; proceeding by commission upon own motion; hearing; order.

Whenever the commission has reason to believe that any motor carrier, regulated motor carrier, other common or contract carrier as described in section 75-109, competitive natural gas provider as defined in section 66-1848, or jurisdictional utility as defined in section 66-1802 is in neglect or violation of a statute or rule or regulation under the jurisdiction of the commission, the commission shall at once institute an investigation and fix a time and place for hearing thereon, upon its own motion, and shall make any order as it deems just and reasonable, including, but not limited to, an order revoking, suspending, or modifying the certificate of public convenience and necessity, permit, registration, license, or other authority granted by the commission or a cease and desist order.

Laws 1963, c. 425, art. I, § 33, p. 1367;

Laws 1994, LB 414, § 46;

Laws 1995, LB 424, § 14;

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 489;

Laws 2005, LB 247, § 1.

The Public Service Commission has exclusive power and jurisdiction to inquire into complaints concerning telephone rates and where service is woefully inadequate, may require rebates. Myers v. Blair Tel. Co., 194 Neb. 55, 230 N.W.2d 190 (1975).